test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-08haeielm_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - häielm: # Noun (36) häielm 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     häielm+N+Sg+Nom: häielm
     häielm+N+Sg+Gen: häielmä
     häielm+N+Sg+Par: häielmät
     häielm+N+Sg+Ill: häielmähe
     häielm+N+Sg+Ine: häielmän
     häielm+N+Sg+Ela: häielmäst
     häielm+N+Sg+All: häielmäle
     häielm+N+Sg+Ade: häielmäl
     häielm+N+Sg+Abl: häielmält
     häielm+N+Sg+Tra: häielmäs
     häielm+N+Sg+Ter: häielmäniq
     häielm+N+Sg+Abe: häielmäldäq
     häielm+N+Sg+Com: häielmägaq
     häielm+N+Pl+Nom: häielmäq
     häielm+N+Pl+Gen: häielmide
     häielm+N+Pl+Par: häielmit
     häielm+N+Pl+Ill: häielmihe
     häielm+N+Pl+Ine: häielmin
     häielm+N+Pl+Ela: häielmist
     häielm+N+Pl+All: häielmile
     häielm+N+Pl+Ade: häielmil
     häielm+N+Pl+Abl: häielmilt
     häielm+N+Pl+Tra: häielmis
     häielm+N+Pl+Ter: häielminiq
     häielm+N+Pl+Abe: häielmildäq
     häielm+N+Pl+Com: häielmidegaq
